trunk/JLanguageTool/src/resource/is/hunspell/is-IS.dic
Alexía/97
Antarktíka/108
Arnþór/83
Austur-Afríka/108
Axelma/97
Bergrín/96
Bjarnar/83
Braghildur/96
Brynja/97
Bíbí/95
Búlgaría/108
Dögun/95
Dýrunn/96
Eilífur/83
Elísa/97
Elísabeth/95
Engill/84
Eyjafjallajökull/90
Finngeir/83
Freydís/96
Fura/97
Fífill/84
Georgía/108
Gunnsteinn/83
Gunnur/96
Hafrós/95
Herbert/83
Hilligerður/96
Héðinn/84
Ida/97
Ingirós/95
Ingþór/83
Inna/97
Jóra/97
Jórunn/96
Kristrós/95
Króatía/108
Lív/95
Mesópótamía/108
Miklihvellur/87
Máritanía/108
Naomí/95
Njóla/97
Nígería/108
Oddfríður/96
Ráðgeir/83
Sigurósk/95
Snæfríður/96
Suður-Afríka/108
Sóldögg/95
Sómalía/108
Tóta/97
Valgeir/83
Vordís/96
alheimur/87
alifuglakjöt/77
andalúsíska/106
arfur/87
atvinnuleysi/82
atvinnumennska/106
auðnutittlingur/86
aðall/90
aðdáun/99
barkspæta/104
barnamosi/93
barnamál/76
berklar/88
beyki/82
blað/80
blaðsíða/105
blesgæs/98
blindsker/79
blóð/77
blóðflokkur/86
blóðfræði/103
blöðrusytrur/107
bolli/92
brasilískur/109
brennidepill/89
bretónska/106
brjósttaug/101
brúnn/111
bygging/102
bátur/85
bæti/81
bókmenntir/100
bólstraberg/76
draugagangur/87
drottinn/89
dvergsnípa/104
dygð/98
dásamlegur/110
dísilvél/101
dúfa/105
edik/77
egg/79
eiginhandaráritun/99
einhyrningur/86
einmanaleiki/93
eldhaf/80
eldur/85
elli/103
ennisvöðvi/92
evrópulerki/82
fallbeyging/102
fannhvítur/109
fannkoma/106
farsæll/111
feðg/88
feðgin/78
fistill/89
fjallafura/104
fjármál/78
fjöldamorð/76
fleyta/105
fléttingur/86
fold/98
foreldrar/88
foreldri/81
foss/91
fress/91
fræðigrein/101
fuglafræði/103
fyrirmennska/106
fyrirsjáanlegur/110
fán/85
fáni/92
fær/109
færiband/80
fínn/111
fólk/77
föðurforeldrar/88
föðurlandssvik/78
geimgeislun/99
geimskip/76
gengill/89
geðlægð/98
gifting/102
glúkósi/93
grey/79
grágrænn/111
grátur/87
gulfura/104
gullgaukur/85
gáta/105
götuviti/92
handarkoss/91
handkoss/91
hannyrðir/100
harðsperrur/107
harðæri/81
haítí-kreólska/106
heigull/89
heilablóðfall/80
heilahristingur/87
heill/111
heitur/109
helgi/103
hjartanlegur/110
hjartastopp/76
hjálp/98
hlíf/101
hnjúkur/86
hrafnafífa/104
hræ/79
hröfnungur/85
hughreysting/102
hugljómun/99
hugskotssjónir/100
humall/89
hundraðfætla/105
hvelatengsl/78
hyldýpi/82
hylli/103
hálfviti/92
háls/91
hófur/86
hósti/93
húsdýr/76
iridín/77
iðgrænn/111
jurt/98
kanína/104
karlmannsnafn/80
kerti/81
kirsuber/79
klunnalegur/110
koltvísýringur/85
koss/91
kross/91
króksnjáldri/92
kunta/105
kurteis/109
kærleiki/93
kólera/106
kóralrif/79
landráð/78
laug/101
lerkitittlingur/86
leyfisleysi/82
litlaus/109
ljósgrænn/111
lystarleysi/81
lystarstol/77
lágmarkspar/80
líffræði/103
líkamshluti/92
líkamsrækt/99
líking/102
lóa/104
lýsingarorð/76
menningarlegur/110
millihýsill/89
minnisleysi/82
misling/88
miðský/79
mjaðjurt/98
mongólska/106
myndrænn/111
mágur/85
máni/92
mæðgin/78
móðurforeldrar/88
mörsugur/87
mýkt/99
nafnarými/81
netjuský/79
nálægur/109
níóbín/77
orðsifjafræði/103
pels/91
persónufornafn/80
pjönkur/107
prinsessa/104
páskar/94
púls/91
púpa/105
ragngaukur/85
rauf/101
raunveruleiki/93
refsing/102
regnþykkni/82
rembingskoss/91
ritill/89
sagnfræðilegur/110
samlíf/76
sannur/87
seftittlingur/86
segulljós/78
sink/77
sjálfsvirðing/102
sjóntaug/101
skammaryrði/81
skarð/80
sker/79
skjaldburkni/92
skotárás/98
skyndihjálp/99
skynsemi/103
skær/109
skógarfura/104
slóvenska/106
snertill/89
spítall/90
stjarnfræðieining/102
stjórnleysi/82
stormur/85
stræti/81
stríða/105
stóismi/93
suðurljós/78
svakalegur/110
svefn/87
sviftifall/80
systkin/78
sægrænn/111
sætabrauð/76
sívalningur/86
tannlaus/109
taug/101
tengdaforeldrar/88
terbín/77
tilgangur/87
tilkynning/102
trefill/89
tregi/93
trúrækni/103
tunga/105
tálvon/98
tónleik/88
tónstigi/92
töfr/88
tölva/104
umburðarlyndi/82
umhverfisvernd/99
vald/80
veldi/81
velska/106
vinsældir/100
vistlegur/110
víkingur/86
vögguvísa/105
Óskar/83
Óðinn/84
Úlfhéðinn/84
ábyrgðarlaus/109
áhrif/78
áhugi/93
álver/76
ár/101
át/77
ávæningur/85
æfing/102
æviferill/90
íris/99
óeirð/98
óeirðir/100
ófarsæll/111
ógnarlegur/110
óveðursský/79
óæskilegur/110
óþolinmæði/103
útskolun/99
þingræði/82
þjóðerni/81
þrái/93
þvottavél/101
